Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-1617
Personnel division of the Department
of Administrative Services; report.

The personnel division
of the Department of Administrative Services shall provide electronically an annual report to the Clerk
of the Legislature. The report shall include the following information based
on the prior fiscal year: (1) The number of temporary employees employed by
the state; (2) the number of such temporary employees who were eligible for
health insurance coverage pursuant to section 84-1601; (3) the number of such
temporary employees who elected coverage; and (4) the average length of health
insurance coverage for those temporary employees who elected coverage.

Laws 1998, LB 1162, § 84;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 233.